Tennessee, session 114, HB1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-6-207, is amended by deleting
"each year" and substituting "by February 15 of each year" and by deleting "criminal justice
committee of the house of representatives" and substituting "committee of the house of
representatives with jurisdiction over criminal justice matters".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1268
002848
- 1 -